etc/dictionaries-common/default.aff
    I R		> -IR, ÍDSELA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍDSELE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍDSELOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍDSELAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍDSELES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍOSLO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍOSLA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍOSLE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍOSLOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍOSLAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍOSLES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍDNOSLO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍDNOSLA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍDNOSLE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍDNOSLOS	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍDNOSLAS	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, ÍDNOSLES	# comer > comerse
